Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2687.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2.1(i)(1), (3)(e)(1) and 4(d)(1) and (d.1)(1) of the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 2.1. Judicial salaries.* * *(i) Annual cost-of-living adjustment.--123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), beginning January 1, 1997, and each January 1 thereafter, the annual salaries under subsections (a) through (h) shall be increased by the lesser of the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area and the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (CPI-W) nationwide for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect. The percentage increase and salary amounts shall be determined prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment by the Supreme Court and shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin by the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania within 20 days of the date the determination is made.* * *Section 3. Compensation of Governor and Lieutenant Governor; State Treasurer; Auditor General; Attorney General; Commissioners of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission; and heads of departments.* * *(e) Annual cost-of-living adjustment.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), beginning January 1, 1997, and each January 1 thereafter, the stated annual salaries of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor, the State Treasurer, the Auditor General, the Attorney General and the heads of the departments and members of boards and commissions denoted herein shall be increased by an annual 20260HB2687PN3757 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cost-of-living increase calculated by applying the lesser of the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area and the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (CPI-W) nationwide, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current salary amounts authorized. The percentage increase and the salary amounts shall be determined by the Governor prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published by the Secretary of the Budget in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within ten days of the date the determination is made.* * *Section 4. Members of the General Assembly.* * *(d) Subsequent annual cost-of-living adjustment for members.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), for the 12-month period beginning December 1, 1997, through November 30, 1998, and for each like 12-month period thereafter, the salary of the members of the General Assembly shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the lesser of the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area and the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (CPI-W) nationwide, for the most 20260HB2687PN3757 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current salary amounts. The percentage increase and the new salary amounts shall be determined jointly by the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published by them in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within ten days of the date such determination is made.* * *(d.1) Subsequent annual cost-of-living adjustment for officers and leaders.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), for the 12-month period beginning December 1, 1997, through November 30, 1998, and for each like 12-month period thereafter, the additional compensation of the officers and leaders of the General Assembly shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the lesser of the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area and the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (CPI-W) nationwide, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current compensation. The percentage increase and the new compensation amounts shall be determined jointly by the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the 20260HB2687PN3757 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 House of Representatives prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 20 days immediately prior to each cost-of-living increase taking effect.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2687PN3757 - 5 - 123456